Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 9 Standards for Natural Gas

Cross references. —

As to standards for gasoline and petroleum products, see chapter 7 of this title.

As to oil and gas, see chapter 5 of title 30.

As to Wyoming natural gas pipeline authority, see §

37-5-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Gas and Oil § 1 et seq.

What constitutes “sale in interstate commerce of natural gas for resale,” so as to be subject to regulation under § 1(b) of Natural Gas Act (15 USC § 717(b)), 73 ALR Fed 804.

38A C.J.S. Gas § 1 et seq.

§ 40-9-101.
Standard natural gas defined.

For the purpose of this chapter standard natural gas shall be considered to have an average standard of heating units of not less than one thousand (1,000) British thermal units per cubic foot of gas, ascertained and determined by the state chemist in accordance with standard conditions, to wit:

At a temperature of sixty degrees Fahrenheit (60° F);

Under pressure of thirty (30) inches of mercury.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 123, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 39-901; W.S. 1957, § 40-77; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “of this chapter” for “of this act” in the introductory language of (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-9-102.
Factors to be considered in fixing rates.

The standard of heating units herein prescribed and any variations therefrom, in any gas distributed by any utility, or utilities, to users of natural gas, shall be taken into consideration by the public service commission as an additional factor to the factors provided for in W.S.

37-2-118

, as a basis for fixing rates and rate schedules for the allowable charges the utility may make against the users of natural gas in any particular town, city or community, in which the question of such rates shall be presented to said commission, as provided for in W.S.

37-2-118

.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 123, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 39-902; W.S. 1957, § 40-78.

Application of section. —

This section by reference to §

37-2-118

attempts to inject another factor, to-wit, the standard of heating units in any gas distributed by a utility, for consideration by the commission. However, an examination of §

37-2-118

reveals that it merely deals with the matter of who may make a complaint to the commission and has nothing whatever to do with the factors which the commission may consider in fixing rates under §§

37-2-119

and

37-2-122

. It is evident that this section is carelessly drawn and enacted. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

§ 40-9-103.
Tests and report of state chemist upon complaint; use of results as evidence and in fixing rates.

Whenever any complaint is made, as provided for in W.S.

37-2-118

, that the heat units of the natural gas supplied by any utility to the users thereof in any town or municipality are below the standard thereof theretofore used as a factor in the basis for rates to be charged by the utility in that particular town or municipality, the public service commission shall notify the state chemist to make proper tests of the heating units of the gas furnished by such utility to the complaining municipality. The state chemist shall certify to the public service commission and to the mayor of the complaining town or municipality the result of such test, which said certificate shall be used as competent evidence by the public service commission at the hearing of said complaint, and shall be used by the commission as one (1) of the factors as a basis for any change in the rates the commission may find necessary to make.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 123, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 39-903; W.S. 1957, § 40-79.

§ 40-9-104.
Municipality may require test every 3 months.

The mayor, or city council of any town or municipality, in which natural gas is furnished by any utility is hereby given the right to require the state chemist to make a test of such gas every three (3) months and to certify the results thereof to said mayor, or city council and public service commission.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 123, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 39-904; W.S. 1957, § 40-80.

§ 40-9-105.
Expense of tests charged to state university.

Any and all expenses incurred by the state chemist in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be a charge against the University of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 123, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 39-905; W.S. 1957, § 40-81; Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to university of Wyoming, see chapter 17 of title 21.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “of this chapter” for “of this act.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.